firefox-addon/dictionaries/tr.dic
aforozlamak/≝
afsunlamak/≝
afyonlamak/≝
agulamak/≝
anaforlamak/≝
arzulamak/≝
avurtlamak/≝
avuçlamak/≝
azotlamak/≝
balyozlamak/≝
bloklamak/≝
bodoslamak/≝
boklamak/≝
boyamak/≝
boylamak/≝
boynuzlamak/≝
bozlamak/≝
boğumlamak/≝
boşamak/≝
boşlamak/≝
budamak/≝
bulamak/≝
bulgulamak/≝
bulgurlamak/≝
bumlamak/≝
bunamak/≝
burcumak/≝
burgulamak/≝
burunlamak/≝
buğulamak/≝
cicozlamak/≝
coplamak/≝
cumbuldamak/≝
cumburdamak/≝
depolamak/≝
dokumak/≝
dolamak/≝
donamak/≝
doruklamak/≝
doğramak/≝
doğrulamak/≝
durulamak/≝
duyumsamak/≝
ebrulamak/≝
efsunlamak/≝
fokurdamak/≝
fonlamak/≝
fonlamak/≝
foslamak/≝
fosurdamak/≝
foşurdamak/≝
gruplamak/≝
gucurdamak/≝
gurklamak/≝
gurlamak/≝
guruldamak/≝
hamurlamak/≝
havuzlamak/≝
hohlamak/≝
homurdamak/≝
hoplamak/≝
horlamak/≝
hortlamak/≝
hortumlamak/≝
horuldamak/≝
ispiyonlamak/≝
kadastrolamak/≝
kalburlamak/≝
kaparozlamak/≝
karbonlamak/≝
kargolamak/≝
kartonlamak/≝
kataloglamak/≝
klonlamak/≝
klorlamak/≝
kocamak/≝
kodlamak/≝
kodlamak/≝
koklamak/≝
kokozlamak/≝
kollamak/≝
koltuklamak/≝
konuklamak/≝
konumlamak/≝
korumak/≝
kotlamak/≝
kovlamak/≝
koçsamak/≝
koşullamak/≝
kulunlamak/≝
kumlamak/≝
kurgulamak/≝
kurulamak/≝
kurumak/≝
kurşunlamak/≝
kutlamak/≝
kutlulamak/≝
kutsamak/≝
kutulamak/≝
kuzulamak/≝
kılavuzlamak/≝
limonlamak/≝
lodoslamak/≝
loğlamak/≝
macunlamak/≝
mahmuzlamak/≝
mantolamak/≝
mazotlamak/≝
mortlamak/≝
moruklamak/≝
mumlamak/≝
muştulamak/≝
nodullamak/≝
notlamak/≝
ocumak/≝
oflamak/≝
ohlamak/≝
oklamak/≝
okramak/≝
okumak/≝
okşamak/≝
olumlamak/≝
olumsuzlamak/≝
olurlamak/≝
omuzlamak/≝
onamak/≝
otamak/≝
otlamak/≝
oylamak/≝
oylumlamak/≝
oynamak/≝
oyulgamak/≝
oyumlamak/≝
ozonlamak/≝
palamutlamak/≝
poflamak/≝
pofurdamak/≝
pohpohlamak/≝
pomak/≝≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
porsumak/≝
pozlamak/≝
puflamak/≝
pullamak/≝
pusulamak/≝
raporlamak/≝
rujlamak/≝
rötuşlamak/≝
sabuklamak/≝
sabunlamak/≝
sifonlamak/≝
silolamak/≝
sollamak/≝
soluklamak/≝
solumak/≝
somutlamak/≝
sonlamak/≝
sonuçlamak/≝
sorgulamak/≝
sorumak/≝
soyutlamak/≝
soğuklamak/≝
soğumak/≝
stoklamak/≝
sulamak/≝
sumsuklamak/≝
susamak/≝
suçlamak/≝
takozlamak/≝
tamponlamak/≝
tapulamak/≝
tohumlamak/≝
tokurdamak/≝
tomruklamak/≝
tonlamak/≝
toplamak/≝
topuklamak/≝
toslamak/≝
tozumak/≝
tunçlamak/≝
turlamak/≝
tutamak/≝≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
tutuklamak/≝
tuzlamak/≝
tuşlamak/≝
ucuzlamak/≝
uflamak/≝
ulamak/≝
ululamak/≝
ulumak/≝
umursamak/≝
unlamak/≝
uygulamak/≝
uyuklamak/≝
uyumak/≝
uzamak/≝
uçuklamak/≝
uğramak/≝
uğrulamak/≝
uğuldamak/≝
uğurlamak/≝
uğursamak/≝
vakumlamak/≝
vazolamak/≝
vurgulamak/≝
yavrulamak/≝
yavuklamak/≝
yağmurlamak/≝
yoklamak/≝
yoksamak/≝
yokumsamak/≝
yollamak/≝
yorumlamak/≝
yoğurtlamak/≝
yudumlamak/≝
yumak/≝≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
yumak/≝≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
yumruklamak/≝
yumurtlamak/≝
yumuşamak/≝
yurtsamak/≝
yuvgulamak/≝
zonklamak/≝
zorlamak/≝
çakozlamak/≝
çamurlamak/≝
çapullamak/≝
çimentolamak/≝
çokramak/≝
çoksamak/≝
çomak/≝≾≿⊀⊁⊂⊃⊄⊅
çoğullamak/≝
çoğumsamak/≝
çubuklamak/≝
çullamak/≝
şavullamak/≝
şorlamak/≝
şutlamak/≝
